Tennessee, session 114, HB2036.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 2, Chapter 13, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) A person shall not qualify as a candidate in a primary election for federal
office who:
(1) Holds dual citizenship; or
(2) Is not a natural-born citizen of the United States.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) "Dual citizenship" means a legal status where a person is
simultaneously recognized as a citizen of the United States and of another
country; and
(2) "Natural-born citizen" means an individual who is a United States
citizen at birth by being born in the United States or born abroad to parents who
are United States citizens.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2036
011453
- 1 -